Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 7. EARLY VOTING

SUBTITLE A. EARLY VOTING

CHAPTER 85. CONDUCT OF VOTING BY PERSONAL APPEARANCE

SUBCHAPTER A. TIME AND PLACE FOR VOTING; ELECTION OFFICERS

Sec. 85.001. EARLY VOTING PERIOD. (a) The period for early voting by personal appearance begins on the 17th day before election day and continues through the fourth day before election day, except as otherwise provided by this section.

(b) For a special runoff election for the office of state senator or state representative or for a runoff primary election, the period begins on the 10th day before election day.

(c) If the date prescribed by Subsection (a) or (b) for beginning the period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal state holiday, the early voting period begins on the next regular business day.

(d) If because of the date for which an election is ordered it is not possible to begin early voting by personal appearance on the prescribed date, the early voting period shall begin on the earliest date practicable after the prescribed date as set by the authority ordering the election.

(e) For an election held on the uniform election date in May and any resulting runoff election, the period for early voting by personal appearance begins on the 12th day before election day and continues through the fourth day before election day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 115, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 471 (H.B. 57), Sec. 8, eff. October 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 85.002. MAIN EARLY VOTING POLLING PLACE. (a) Early voting by personal appearance for each election shall be conducted at the main early voting polling place.

(b) In an election in which a county clerk or city secretary is the early voting clerk under Section 83.002 or 83.005, the main early voting polling place shall be located in any room selected by the early voting clerk in the building that houses the main business office of the county clerk or city secretary, as applicable. However, if the commissioners court or city governing body determines that locating the polling place in that building is impracticable, the commissioners court or city governing body may designate a different location in the city in which the business office is located that is as near as practicable to the business office.

(c) In an election in which a county clerk is the early voting clerk under Section 83.003 or 83.004, the authority authorized to appoint the clerk shall designate the location of the main early voting polling place. The location must be in the territory covered by the election or in any room selected by the clerk in the building that houses the county clerk's main business office, whether or not the office is located in the territory covered by the election. However, if the commissioners court determines that locating the polling place in that building is impracticable, the commissioners court may designate a different location in the city in which the business office is located that is as near as practicable to the business office.

(d) In an election in which a person other than a county clerk or city secretary is early voting clerk, the authority appointing the clerk shall designate the location of the main early voting polling place. The location must be in the territory covered by the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.003. VOTERS SERVED BY MAIN POLLING PLACE. Any person entitled to vote an early voting ballot by personal appearance may do so at the main early voting polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.004. PUBLIC NOTICE OF MAIN POLLING PLACE LOCATION. The election order and the election notice must designate and state the location of the main early voting polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 51, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 85.005. REGULAR DAYS AND HOURS FOR VOTING. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), in an election in which a county clerk is the early voting clerk under Section 83.002, early voting by personal appearance at the main early voting polling place shall be conducted on each weekday of the early voting period that is not a legal state holiday and for a period of at least nine hours, except that voting may not be conducted earlier than 6 a.m. or later than 10 p.m.

(b) In an election to which Subsection (a) does not apply, early voting by personal appearance at the main early voting polling place shall be conducted at least nine hours each weekday of the early voting period that is not a legal state holiday unless the territory covered by the election has fewer than 1,000 registered voters. In that case, the voting shall be conducted at least four hours each day. The authority ordering the election, or the county clerk if that person is the early voting clerk, shall determine which hours the voting is to be conducted.

(c) Voting in a primary election or the general election for state and county officers shall be conducted at the main early voting polling place for at least 12 consecutive hours on each weekday of the last week of the early voting period, and the voting in a special election ordered by the governor shall be conducted at the main early voting polling place for at least 12 consecutive hours on each of the last two days of the early voting period. Voting under this subsection may not be conducted earlier than 6 a.m. or later than 10 p.m.

(d) A voter who has not voted before the scheduled time for closing a polling place is entitled to vote after that time if the voter is in line at the polling place by closing time. The secretary of state shall promulgate any materials and provide any training to presiding judges necessary to properly process voters under this subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1142, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.07; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.17, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.09, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 85.006. VOTING ON SATURDAY OR SUNDAY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the authority ordering an election may order early voting by personal appearance at the main early voting polling place to be conducted on one or more Saturdays or Sundays during the early voting period.

(b) In an election in which a county clerk is the early voting clerk under Section 83.002, only the early voting clerk may order voting on a Saturday or Sunday. The clerk must do so by written order.

(c) The authority ordering voting on a Saturday or Sunday shall determine the hours during which voting is to be conducted.

(d) The authority authorized to order early voting on a Saturday or Sunday under Subsection (a) or (b) shall order the voting under the applicable subsection on receipt of a written request submitted by at least 15 registered voters of the territory covered by the election. The request must be submitted in time to enable compliance with Section 85.007. The authority is not required to order the voting on a particular date specified by the request but shall order the voting on at least one Saturday if a Saturday is requested and on at least one Sunday if a Sunday is requested.

(e) In a primary election or the general election for state and county officers, the early voting clerk shall order voting by personal appearance at the main early voting polling place to be conducted on the last Saturday of the early voting period for at least 12 consecutive hours, except that voting may not be conducted earlier than 6 a.m. or later than 10 p.m., and on the last Sunday of the early voting period for at least six consecutive hours, except that voting may not be conducted earlier than 9 a.m. or later than 10 p.m. This subsection supersedes any provision of this subchapter to the extent of any conflict.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1142, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.08; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.10, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 85.007. PUBLIC NOTICE OF TIME FOR VOTING. (a) The election order and the election notice must state:

(1) the date that early voting will begin if under Section 85.001(d) the early voting period is to begin later than the prescribed date;

(2) the regular dates and hours that voting will be conducted under Section 85.005(b); and

(3) the dates and hours that voting on Saturday or Sunday is ordered to be conducted under Section 85.006(a).

(b) The early voting clerk shall post notice for each election stating the dates and hours that voting on a Saturday or Sunday is ordered to be conducted under Section 85.006(b).

(c) Notice under Subsection (b) shall be posted continuously for at least 72 hours immediately preceding the first hour that the voting to which the notice pertains will be conducted. The notice shall be posted on:

(1) the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court if the early voting clerk is the county clerk of a county that does not maintain an Internet website, or of the city governing body if the early voting clerk is the city secretary; or

(2) the county's Internet website if the early voting clerk is the county clerk of a county that maintains an Internet website.

(d) Any notice required under this section must also be posted:

(1) on the Internet website of the authority ordering the election, if the authority maintains a website; and

(2) for a primary election or the general election for state and county officers, by the secretary of state on the secretary's Internet website.

(e) The authority ordering an election shall forward its election notice to the secretary of state in a manner that affords the secretary of state sufficient time to comply with Subsection (d)(2).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1092 (H.B. 2721), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 52, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 85.008. DAYS AND HOURS FOR VOTING: ELECTION IN CERTAIN CITIES. (a) This section applies only to a city with a population of more than 450,000 in which all members of the governing body are elected on an at-large basis.

(b) Notwithstanding and in addition to other applicable provisions of this code, in an election in which the city secretary is the early voting clerk under Section 83.005, early voting by personal appearance shall be conducted on the corresponding days and for the same number of hours that the voting is required to be conducted in the general election for state and county officers in the county in which a majority of the population of the city is located.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 172, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 85.009. ELECTION OFFICERS FOR GENERAL ELECTION FOR STATE AND COUNTY OFFICERS. (a) The county clerk shall select election officers for the main early voting polling place and any branch polling place from a list provided under Subsection (b), in a manner that provides equal representation to the extent possible for each political party holding a primary election in the county.

(b) Before July of each year, the county chair of each political party holding a primary election in the county shall submit in writing to the county clerk a list of names of persons in order of preference for each early voting polling place who are eligible for selection as an election officer. The county chair may supplement the list of names of persons until the 30th day before early voting begins in case an appointed election officer becomes unable to serve. The county clerk shall appoint the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted in compliance with this subsection by the party with the highest number of votes in the county as the presiding judge of that polling place and the first person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements from the list submitted in compliance with this subsection by the party with the second highest number of votes in the county as the alternate presiding judge of that polling place. The county clerk shall appoint additional election officers for each polling place in the manner described by Subsection (a). The county clerk may reject the list if the persons whose names are submitted on the list are determined not to meet the applicable eligibility requirements.

(c) The county clerk, after making a reasonable effort to consult with the party chair of the appropriate political party or parties, may select election officers for each early voting polling place in which a list is not submitted in a manner that attempts to ensure equal representation to the extent possible for the parties holding a primary election in the county.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 558 (S.B. 1434), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 85.0091. EARLY VOTING ELECTION OFFICERS FOR PRIMARY ELECTIONS. (a) The early voting clerk shall select election officers for a primary election for the main early voting polling place and any branch polling place in a manner consistent with Section 85.009, except that the early voting clerk shall prescribe the deadline by which county chairs must submit names of persons eligible to serve as election officers during early voting.

(b) This section does not apply to a joint primary governed by Section 172.126.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 85.010. EARLY VOTING POLLING PLACE FOR CERTAIN ELECTIONS HELD BY POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) This section applies to an election held by a political subdivision, other than a county, on the November uniform election date in which the political subdivision:

(1) is not holding a joint election with a county in accordance with Chapter 271; and

(2) has not executed a contract with a county elections officer under which the political subdivision and the county share early voting polling places for the election.

(a-1) In this section, "eligible county polling place" means an early voting polling place established by a county.

(b) A political subdivision that holds an election described by Subsection (a):

(1) shall designate as an early voting polling place for the election an eligible county polling place located in the political subdivision; and

(2) may not designate as an early voting polling place a location other than an eligible county polling place unless each eligible county polling place located in the political subdivision is designated as an early voting polling place by the political subdivision.

(c) A shared polling place established under Subsection (b) that is designated as a main early voting polling place by any political subdivision must be open for voting for all political subdivisions the polling place serves for at least the days and hours required of a main early voting polling place under Section 85.002 for the political subdivision making the designation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 636 (H.B. 506), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 1048), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.11, eff. December 2, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. POLLING PLACE PROCEDURE

Sec. 85.031. ACCEPTING VOTER. (a) For each person entitled to vote an early voting ballot by personal appearance, the early voting clerk shall follow the procedure for accepting a regular voter on election day, with the modifications necessary for the conduct of early voting.

(b) On accepting a voter, the clerk shall indicate beside the voter's name on the list of registered voters that the voter is accepted to vote by personal appearance unless the form of the list makes it impracticable to do so, and the clerk shall enter the voter's name on the poll list.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 11, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 85.0311. EARLY VOTING CLERK TO SIGN BALLOTS. (a) The early voting clerk's initials shall be placed on the back of each ballot to be used at the polling place.

(b) The early voting clerk shall enter the initials on each ballot or a deputy early voting clerk shall stamp a facsimile of the initials on each ballot.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 85.032. SECURITY OF EARLY VOTING BALLOT BOX. (a) The procedure for rotating two ballot boxes applicable to a precinct polling place does not apply to an early voting polling place. Once locked for use in an election, the early voting ballot box may not be unlocked except as provided by this subtitle.

(b) The ballot box in which voters deposit their marked early voting ballots must have two locks, each with a different key, and must be designed and constructed so that the box can be sealed to detect any unauthorized opening of the box and that the ballot slot can be sealed to prevent any unauthorized deposit in the box. The seals for the boxes must be serially numbered for each election. The procedures prescribed by Sections 127.064, 127.065, 127.066, and 127.068 governing the use of sealed ballot boxes in electronic voting system elections apply to the use of sealed ballot boxes under this title to the extent those procedures can be made applicable. The secretary of state shall prescribe any procedures necessary to implement the use of sealed ballot boxes in early voting.

(c) During the period for early voting by personal appearance, the early voting clerk shall keep the key to one of the locks to the early voting ballot box, and the custodian of keys to ballot boxes for preserving voted ballots after the election shall keep the key to the second lock.

(d) Each custodian shall retain possession of the key entrusted to the custodian until it is delivered to the presiding judge of the central counting station.

(e) A sealed case may be used for transferring voted early voting ballots in accordance with procedures approved by the secretary of state.

(f) The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures providing for the security of the voted early voting ballots from the last day of voting by personal appearance at a polling place until the day the ballots are counted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 562, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 74, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 85.033. SECURITY OF VOTING MACHINE. At the close of early voting each day, the early voting clerk shall secure each voting machine used for early voting in the manner prescribed by the secretary of state so that its unauthorized operation is prevented. The clerk shall unsecure the machine before the beginning of early voting the following day.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.034. VOTER UNABLE TO ENTER POLLING PLACE. Early voting by personal appearance by a voter who is voting outside the early voting polling place shall be conducted pursuant to Section 64.009.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 2.01, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 85.035. ASSISTING VOTER. A person voting an early voting ballot by personal appearance who is assisted in preparing the ballot by election officers under Subchapter B, Chapter 64, may be assisted by a single officer.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.036. ELECTIONEERING. (a) During the time an early voting polling place is open for the conduct of early voting, a person may not electioneer for or against any candidate, measure, or political party in or within 100 feet of an outside door through which a voter may enter the building or structure in which the early voting polling place is located.

(b) The entity that owns or controls a public building being used as an early voting polling place may not, at any time during the early voting period, prohibit electioneering on the building's premises outside of the area described in Subsection (a), but may enact reasonable regulations concerning the time, place, and manner of electioneering.

(c) During the early voting period, the early voting clerk shall keep continuously posted:

(1) at the entrance to the room or area, as applicable, in which the early voting polling place is located, a sign on which is printed in large letters "Early Voting Polling Place"; and

(2) at the outer limits of the area within which electioneering is prohibited, a sign on which is printed in large letters "Distance Marker. No electioneering between this point and the entrance to the early voting polling place."

(d) A person commits an offense if the person electioneers in violation of Subsection (a).

(e) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(f) In this section:

(1) "Early voting period" means the period prescribed by Section 85.001.

(2) "Electioneering" includes the posting, use, or distribution of political signs or literature.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.09; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 498, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 639, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 235 (H.B. 259), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 235 (H.B. 259), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 85.037. BYSTANDERS EXCLUDED; UNLAWFUL PRESENCE OF CANDIDATE. Section 61.001 applies to an early voting polling place except that the period for which the conduct is proscribed is during the time the polling place is open for the conduct of early voting.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1350, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER C. BRANCH EARLY VOTING POLLING PLACE

Sec. 85.061. PERMANENT BRANCH POLLING PLACE. (a) In a countywide election in which the county clerk is the early voting clerk under Section 83.002, an early voting polling place shall be located inside each branch office that is regularly maintained for conducting general clerical functions of the county clerk, except as provided by Subsection (b). If a suitable room is unavailable inside the branch office, the polling place may be located in another room inside the same building as the branch office.

(b) In an election in which a temporary branch polling place is established under Section 85.062(a)(1) or (d), the commissioners court may provide by resolution, order, or other official action that any one or more of the county clerk's regularly maintained branch clerical offices are not to be branch early voting polling places in the election.

(c) In this subchapter, "permanent branch polling place" means an early voting polling place established under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.10; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.12, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 85.062. TEMPORARY BRANCH POLLING PLACE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (d) or (e), one or more early voting polling places other than the main early voting polling place may be established by:

(1) the commissioners court, for an election in which the county clerk is the early voting clerk; or

(2) the governing body of the political subdivision served by the authority ordering the election, for an election in which a person other than the county clerk is the early voting clerk.

(b) A polling place established under this section may be located, subject to Subsection (d), at any place in the territory served by the early voting clerk and may be located inside any building as directed by the authority establishing the branch office. The polling place may not be located in a movable structure in the general election for state and county officers, general primary election, or runoff primary election. Ropes or other suitable objects may be used at the polling place to ensure compliance with Section 62.004. Persons who are not expressly permitted by law to be in a polling place shall be excluded from the polling place to the extent practicable.

(c) In any election, the location of a polling place established under this section shall be fixed at one place for the duration of the period that voting is required to be conducted at the polling place.

(d) In a primary election, the general election for state and county officers, or a special election to fill a vacancy in the legislature or in congress:

(1) the commissioners court of a county with a population of 400,000 or more shall establish one or more early voting polling places other than the main early voting polling place in each state representative district containing territory covered by the election, except that the polling place or places shall be established in the state senatorial or congressional district, as applicable, in a special election to fill a vacancy in the office of state senator or United States representative;

(2) the commissioners court of a county with a population of 120,000 or more but less than 400,000 shall establish one or more early voting polling places other than the main early voting polling place in each commissioners precinct containing territory covered by the election; and

(3) the early voting clerk of a county with a population of 100,000 or more but less than 120,000 shall establish one or more early voting polling places as described by Subdivision (2) in each precinct for which the early voting clerk receives in time to enable compliance with Section 85.067 a written request for that action submitted by at least 15 registered voters of that precinct.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 10.01(1), eff. December 2, 2021.

(f) In a countywide election, the total number of permanent branch polling places and temporary branch polling places open for voting at the same time in a commissioners precinct may not exceed twice the number of permanent branch and temporary branch polling places open at that time in another commissioners precinct.

(f-1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section concerning the location of temporary branch polling places, in an election in which countywide polling places are used, the commissioners court of a county shall employ the same methodology it uses to determine the location of countywide polling places to determine the location of temporary branch polling places.

(g) In this subchapter, "temporary branch polling place" means an early voting polling place established under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.11, 1.12; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1350, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1381, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 53, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 3.13, eff. December 2, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 10.01(1), eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 85.063. DAYS AND HOURS FOR VOTING: PERMANENT BRANCH. Early voting by personal appearance at each permanent branch polling place shall be conducted on the same days and during the same hours as voting is conducted at the main early voting polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.11; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.064. DAYS AND HOURS FOR VOTING: TEMPORARY BRANCH.

(a) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

(b) Early voting by personal appearance at each temporary branch polling place shall be conducted on the days that voting is required to be conducted at the main early voting polling place under Section 85.005 and remain open for at least:

(1) eight hours each day; or

(2) three hours each day if the city or county clerk does not serve as the early voting clerk for the territory holding the election and the territory has fewer than 1,000 registered voters.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

(d) The authority authorized under Section 85.006 to order early voting on a Saturday or Sunday may also order, in the manner prescribed by that section, early voting to be conducted on a Saturday or Sunday at any one or more of the temporary branch polling places. In addition, the early voting clerk shall order such voting in accordance with Section 85.006(e) at each temporary branch polling place established under Section 85.062(d).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1142, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.13; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 55, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 85.066. VOTERS SERVED BY BRANCH POLLING PLACE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), any voter who is entitled to vote an early voting ballot by personal appearance may do so at any branch polling place in the territory served by the early voting clerk.

(b) For a countywide election in a county with a population of more than 3.3 million and a primary election in a county with a population of more than 1 million in which temporary branch polling places are established under Section 85.062(d)(1), the commissioners court may limit voting at a temporary branch polling place to the voters of particular state representative districts. To the extent practicable, the state representative districts shall be grouped so that the temporary branch polling places in each group serve substantially equal numbers of voters. A maximum of four groups of state representative districts may be established under this subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.15; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 85.067. PUBLIC NOTICE OF BRANCH VOTING SCHEDULE. (a) The early voting clerk shall post for each election a schedule stating:

(1) the location of each permanent and temporary branch polling place at which voting will be conducted and the election precincts served by each branch polling place; and

(2) except as provided by Subsection (b), the dates and hours that temporary branch voting will be conducted.

(b) The schedule is not required to include dates and hours for which public notice is posted under Section 85.068.

(c) The schedule shall be posted continuously for a period beginning not later than the fifth day before the first day of the period for early voting by personal appearance and ending on the last day of that period. The schedule may be amended after the beginning of early voting by personal appearance to include notice of additional temporary branch polling place locations, dates, and hours, but any amendment must be made not later than the fifth day before the date the voting is scheduled to begin at the additional temporary branch.

(d) The schedule shall be posted on:

(1) the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the governing body of the political subdivision served by the authority ordering the election or, if the early voting clerk is the county clerk of a county that does not maintain an Internet website or city secretary, meetings of the commissioners court or city governing body, as applicable; or

(2) the county's Internet website if the early voting clerk is the county clerk of a county that maintains an Internet website.

(e) The early voting clerk shall make copies of the schedule available to the public in reasonable quantities without charge during the posting period.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 7(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.16; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1052 (H.B. 933), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 85.068. PUBLIC NOTICE OF ADDITIONAL VOTING TIME ORDERED BY CLERK. (a) The early voting clerk shall post notice for each election stating any dates and the hours that voting on Saturday or Sunday will be conducted under Section 85.064(d), if the early voting clerk is a county clerk or city secretary under Section 83.002 or 83.005.

(b) The notice is not required to include the dates and hours that appear in the branch office voting schedule posted under Section 85.067.

(c) The notice shall be posted as provided by Section 85.007(c).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1142, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1.17; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 57, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 679 (H.B. 1217), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 85.070. DELIVERY OF APPLICATIONS TO MAIN POLLING PLACE. Each early voting ballot application submitted at a branch polling place shall be delivered by an election officer to the main polling place not later than 1 p.m. on the day after the date the application is submitted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.11; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.071. DELIVERY OF BALLOTS TO MAIN POLLING PLACE. (a) During the period for early voting by personal appearance, the ballots voted at a branch polling place, other than those cast on a voting machine, shall be:

(1) retained securely at the branch polling place in a locked room accessible only to election officers; or

(2) delivered by an election officer or designated law enforcement officer to the main early voting polling place at the close of voting each day.

(b) The unvoted ballots at the branch polling place, other than voting machine ballots, shall be retained or delivered with the voted ballots but in a separate locked container.

(c) All voted and unvoted ballots shall be delivered by an election officer or designated law enforcement officer to the main polling place at the close of voting on the last day of voting at the branch polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.11; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 85.072. BRANCH DAILY REGISTER. (a) Each day early voting is conducted at a branch polling place, an election officer in charge of the branch shall prepare a register listing the voters who cast ballots at the branch that day.

(b) The register must include for each voter the information necessary for entering the voter's name on the early voting roster for the election.

(c) The election officer preparing the register shall deliver it to the early voting clerk at the close of each day's voting at the branch polling place.

(d) The early voting clerk shall preserve each daily register for the period for preserving the precinct election records.

(e) A current copy of the register shall be kept at the branch polling place during the period voting is conducted there.

(f) The early voting clerk shall provide, in a downloadable database format, a current copy of the register for posting on the Internet website of the authority ordering the election, if the authority maintains a website, each day early voting is conducted. At a minimum, the voter registration number for each voter listed in the register must be posted.

(g) The early voting clerk shall compile the registers and electronically submit to the secretary of state a record of each voter participating in a primary, a runoff primary, a general election, or any special election ordered by the governor not later than the day the voter votes in person or the early voting clerk receives a ballot voted by mail.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.11; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (H.B. 1850), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.